tr: Joystick sensör teknolojisi: Hall etkisi; Manyetik kodlayıcı; Mekanik anahtar; Optik; Potansiyometre; Diğer
nl: Joystick-sensortechnologie: Hall-effect; Magnetische encoder; Mechanische schakelaar; Optisch; Potentiometer; Andere
es: Tecnología del sensor del joystick: Efecto Hall; Codificador magnético; Interruptor mecánico; Óptico; Potenciómetro; Otros
vi: Công nghệ cảm biến cần điều khiển: Hiệu ứng Hall; Bộ mã hóa từ tính; Công tắc cơ khí; Quang học; Chiết áp; Khác
zh-TW: 搖桿感測器技術: 霍爾效應; 磁性編碼器; 機械開關; 光學; 電位器; 其他
da: Joystick-sensorteknologi: Hall-effekt; Magnetisk encoder; Mekanisk kontakt; Optisk; Potentiometer; Andet
el: Τεχνολογία αισθητήρα joystick: Hall effect; Μαγνητικός κωδικοποιητής; Μηχανικός διακόπτης; Οπτικό καλώδιο; Ποτενσιόμετρο; Άλλο
de: Joystick-Sensortechnologie: Hall-Effekt; Magnetischer Encoder; Mechanischer Schalter; Optisch; Potentiometer; Sonstiges
th: เทคโนโลยีเซ็นเซอร์จอยสติก: Hall effect; ตัวเข้ารหัสแม่เหล็ก; สวิตช์กลไก; ออปติคัล; โพเทนชิโอมิเตอร์; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Tecnologia do sensor do joystick: Efeito Hall; Codificador magnético; Interruptor mecânico; Ótico; Potenciómetro; Outro
pt-BR: Tecnologia de sensor do joystick: Efeito Hall; Codificador magnético; Interruptor mecânico; Óptica; Potenciômetro; Outro
ro-RO: Tehnologie senzor joystick: Efect Hall; Codificator magnetic; Comutator mecanic; Optic; Potențiometru; Altele
ja: ジョイスティックセンサー技術: ホール効果; 磁気エンコーダー; メカニカルスイッチ; 光学式; ポテンショメーター; その他
it: Tecnologia del sensore del joystick: Effetto Hall; Encoder magnetico; Interruttore meccanico; Ottico; Potenziometro; Altro
fr: Technologie de capteur du joystick: Effet Hall; Encodeur magnétique; Interrupteur mécanique; Optique; Potentiomètre; Autre
nb: Joystick-sensorteknologi: Hall-effekt; Magnetisk enkoder; Mekanisk bryter; Optisk; Potensiometer; Annet
lt-LT: Vairasvirtės jutiklio technologija: Hall efektas; Magnetinis kodavimo įrenginys; Mechaninis jungiklis; Optinis; Potenciometras; Kita
hu: Botkormány érzékelő technológiája: Hall-effektus; Mágneses kódoló; Mechanikus kapcsoló; Optikai; Potenciométer; Egyéb
sv: Joystickens sensorteknologi: Hall-effekt; Magnetisk kodare; Mekanisk omkopplare; Optisk; Potentiometer; Övrigt
zh-CN: 操纵杆传感器技术: 霍尔效应; 磁编码器; 机械开关; 光学; 电位器; 其他
ru: Технология датчика джойстика: Эффект Холла; Магнитный энкодер; Механический переключатель; Оптический; Потенциометр; Другой
sl-SI: Tehnologija senzorja joysticka: Hall efekt; Magnetni kodirnik; Mehanski stikalo; Optično; Potenciometer; Drugo
cs: Senzorová technologie joysticku: Hallův jev; Magnetický kodér; Mechanický spínač; Optická; Potenciometr; Jiné
pl: Technologia czujnika joysticka: Hall effect; Enkoder magnetyczny; Przełącznik mechaniczny; Optyczne; Potencjometr; Inne
hr-HR: Senzorska tehnologija joysticka: Hallov efekt; Magnetski enkoder; Mehanički prekidač; Optički; Potenciometar; Ostalo
ko: 조이스틱 센서 기술: 홀 이펙트; 마그네틱 인코더; 기계식 스위치; 광학; 포텐셔미터; 기타
sk-SK: Senzorová technológia joysticku: Hallov efekt; Magnetický enkodér; Mechanický spínač; Optický; Potenciometer; Iné
bg-BG: Сензорна технология на джойстика: Ефект на Хол; Магнитен енкодер; Механичен превключвател; Оптично; Потенциометър; Други
fi: Ohjaussauvan anturitekniikka: Hall-ilmiö; Magneettinen enkooderi; Mekaaninen kytkin; Optinen; Potentiometri; Muu
en: Joystick sensor technology: Hall effect; Magnetic encoder; Mechanical switch; Optical; Potentiometer; Other